Utah statutes.
49-11-201.   Establishment of retirement office -- An independent state
agency -- Office exemption.
(1) (a)  There is established the Utah State Retirement Office, which may also
be known and function as the Utah State Retirement Systems.
(b)  The office shall administer the systems, plans, and programs and perform
all other functions assigned to it under this title.
(2) (a)  The office is an independent state agency.
(b)  It is subject to legislative and executive department budgetary review
and comment.
(3)  The office may establish branch offices upon approval of the board.
(4)  The board and office are exempt from those acts which are applicable to
state and other governmental entities under this code.
